Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1,106
Tribal-state compact governing gaming; Governor; powers.

(1) Upon request of an Indian tribe having jurisdiction over Indian lands in Nebraska, the Governor or his or her designated representative or representatives shall, pursuant to 25 U.S.C. 2710 of the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, negotiate with such Indian tribe in good faith for the purpose of entering into a tribal-state compact governing the conduct of Class III gaming as defined in the act. A compact which is negotiated pursuant to this section shall be executed by the Governor without ratification by the Legislature.

(2) It shall be the policy of this state that any compact negotiated pursuant to this section shall (a) protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public and (b) promote tribal economic development, tribal self-sufficiency, and strong tribal government.

(3) Such compact negotiations shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of 25 U.S.C. 2710 of the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act.

Laws 1993, LB 231, § 1.